FST/tuv/phonetize.xfst
regex %+N -> 0,,
        %+SG -> 0,,
        %+PL -> л а р,,
        %+PSS1S -> в ы с,,
        %+PSS2S -> ы ң,,
        %+PSS3S/PSS3P -> з ы,,
        %+PSS1P -> в ы с,,
        %+PSS2P -> ң а р,,

! Gen and Acc only with psor, check pror + GEN
        %+NOM -> 0,,
        %+GEN -> т ы ң,,
        %+ACC -> н ы,,
        %+DAT -> г а,,
        %+LOC -> д а,,
        %+ABL -> д а н,,
        %+ALL -> д а а ҕ а р;
